Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 18. Right to Try Act

§ 35-7-1801.
Short title.

This article is known and may be cited as the “Right To Try Act.”

History.

2015 ch. 174, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 174, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-7-1802.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Eligible patient” means a person who has:

A terminal illness;

Considered all other treatment options currently approved by the United States food and drug administration;

Received a recommendation from a physician for an investigational drug, biological product or device;

Given written, informed consent for the use of the investigational drug, biological product or device or, if the patient is a minor or lacks the mental capacity to provide informed consent, a parent or legal guardian has given written informed consent on the patient’s behalf; and

Documentation from a physician that the person meets the requirements of this paragraph.

“Investigational drug, biological product or device” means a drug, biological product or device that has successfully completed phase one of a clinical trial but has not yet been approved for general use by the United States Food and Drug Administration and remains under investigation in a clinical trial;

“Terminal illness” means a disease that, without life-sustaining procedures, will soon result in death or a state of permanent unconsciousness from which recovery is unlikely.

History.

2015 ch. 174, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-7-1803.
Availability of investigational drugs, biological products or devices; insurance coverage.

A manufacturer of an investigational drug, biological product or device may make the drug, product or device available to eligible patients in accordance with the provisions of this section. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a manufacturer to make available any drug, product or device.

A health care insurer may, but is not required to, provide coverage for the cost of an investigational drug, biological product or device.

Nothing in this section expands the coverage provided in W.S.

26-20-301

.

History.

2015 ch. 174, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-7-1804.
Action against physician license prohibited.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Wyoming state board of medicine shall not revoke, fail to renew, suspend or take any other action against a physician’s license issued pursuant to W.S.

33-26-101

et seq., based solely on the physician’s recommendations to an eligible patient regarding access to or treatment with an investigational drug, biological product or device, as long as the recommendations are consistent with medical standards of care.

History.

2015 ch. 174, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-7-1805.
Access to investigational drugs, biological products and devices.

An official, employee or agent of this state shall not block or attempt to block an eligible patient’s access to an investigational drug, biological product or device. Counseling, advice or a recommendation consistent with medical standards of care from a licensed health care provider is not a violation of this section.

History.

2015 ch. 174, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-7-1806.
No cause of action created.

This article does not create a private cause of action against a manufacturer of an investigational drug, biological product or device, or against any other person or entity involved in the care of an eligible patient using the investigational drug, biological product or device, so long as the manufacturer or other person or entity is complying in good faith with the terms of this article.

History.

2015 ch. 174, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.